District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.41

Compensation and other permitted payments.

(a)

A nonprofit corporation may pay reasonable compensation or reimburse reasonable expenses to members, directors, delegates, members of a designated body, or officers for services rendered.

(b)

A nonprofit corporation may confer benefits upon or make contributions to members or nonmembers in conformity with its purposes, repurchase its memberships only to the extent provided in § 29-404.22, or repay capital contributions, except when:

(1)

The corporation is currently insolvent or would thereby be made insolvent or rendered unable to carry on its purposes; or

(2)

The fair value of the assets of the corporation remaining after the conferring of benefits, contribution, repurchase, or repayment would be insufficient to meet its liabilities.

(c)

A nonprofit corporation may make distributions of cash or property to members upon dissolution or final liquidation only as permitted by this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-404.40.

Section References